Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202528-1601
Property used in commission of covered offenses; forfeiture; proceeding; prosecuting authority; duties; pretrial hearing; intervention; evidentiary hearing; court orders; failure to appear; storage fee.

(1) For purposes of sections 28-1601 to 28-1603:

(a) Covered offense means a violation of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or a financial transaction offense;

(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in section 28-833;

(c) Financial transaction offense means a violation of sections 28-618 to 28-630; and

(d) Gambling device has the same meaning as in section 28-1101.

(2) In addition to existing penalties for a violation of a covered offense, a court may order forfeiture of any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices; any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices; or any gambling devices if:

(a) The owner or possessor of the property has been convicted of a covered offense;

(b) The information charging such violation specifically requests the forfeiture of property upon conviction and is prepared pursuant to section 28-1602; and

(c) It is found by clear and convincing evidence that such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense.

(3) Following the filing of an information charging a violation of a covered offense that specifically seeks forfeiture of any property listed in subsection (2) of this section, the defendant may request a pretrial hearing to determine the existence of probable cause to believe that the property specifically sought to be forfeited was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense. The request for a hearing pursuant to this section must be filed with the district court in which the criminal proceeding is pending within thirty days after the filing of the information.

(4)(a) At any time after the filing of the information in district court and prior to final disposition of the criminal case, any person, other than the defendant, with a claimed legal interest in the property may petition to intervene in the district court with jurisdiction over the criminal case for the specific and limited purpose of demonstrating such person's legal interest in the property and such person's lack of actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense.

(b) In the petition to intervene, the intervening person shall, at a minimum, state facts demonstrating such person's legal interest in the property and such person's lack of actual knowledge regarding the use or intended use of the property.

(5) Within thirty days after filing a motion to intervene, the district court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing on the matter. At the conclusion of such hearing, the court may order that any or all of the property be returned to the intervening claimant after it is no longer needed as evidence in the criminal case upon a showing by the claimant by a preponderance of the evidence:

(a) That the claimant has a legally recognized interest in the property; and

(b) Either (i) that such property was acquired by the claimant in good faith and the claimant did not have actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense or (ii) that the property seized was not derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense.

(6) The court, on its own motion or upon application of the claimant, may permit the claimant to proceed in forma pauperis under sections 25-2301 to 25-2310. The court, on its own motion or upon application of the claimant, may appoint counsel to represent the claimant if the claimant is indigent. If the claimant asserts indigency, the court shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine the claimant's financial condition and may require the claimant to execute an affidavit of indigency for filing with the clerk of the court.

(7) After conviction but prior to sentencing for a covered offense in cases in which the prosecuting authority has specifically requested forfeiture of property, the district court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing at which the prosecuting authority must prove by clear and convincing evidence what specific amount or portion of the property specifically enumerated in the criminal information was derived from, used, or intended for use in furtherance of a covered offense. At the conclusion of such hearing, the court shall make specific findings of fact indicating what amount or portion of the property sought to be forfeited by the state was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense. The court shall order any amount or portion of the property not proven by the state to be derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense or the fair market value of the legally recognized interest in such property be returned to its rightful and legal owner or interest holder.

(8)(a) The court shall order that any amount or portion of property proven by the state by clear and convincing evidence to be derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense be forfeited to the state and disposition of such property be conducted in accordance with this subsection and section 28-1439.02 at such time as the property is no longer required as evidence in any criminal proceeding.

(b) As part of any disposition of property, the court may order that: (i) For a covered offense other than a financial transaction offense, any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be distributed as provided in Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (ii) for a financial transaction offense, any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be credited to the Financial Fraud Victims' Reimbursement Fund for the purposes described in section 84-222; (iii) any conveyances be sold or put to official use by the seizing agency for a period of not more than one year and when such property is no longer necessary for official use or at the end of two years, whichever comes first, such property shall be sold. Proceeds from the sale of any conveyance shall be distributed as provided in Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska; (iv) any electronic communication devices, any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices, or any gambling devices be destroyed by a law enforcement agency; and (v) the disposition of firearms shall be effectuated pursuant to section 29-820.

(c) As used in this subsection, official use means use directly in connection with enforcement of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, sections 28-618 to 28-630, or section 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107.

(9) Any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic communication devices; any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices; or any gambling devices may be forfeited pursuant to a plea agreement between the state and the defendant subject to notice to or approval of the court.

(10) Subdivision (2)(a) of this section does not apply if the owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States before charges are filed or a conviction obtained.

(11) Subdivision (2)(b) of this section does not apply if the owner or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States before charges are filed so long as the statute of limitations for a covered offense has not expired.

(12) Subdivision (2)(a) of this section does not apply if the owner or possessor of the property is unknown or incapable of being determined for some legitimate reason or fails to appear in court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense is commenced and is not apprehended within twelve months after the failure to appear order was issued by the court.

(13) If the owner or possessor of the property fails to appear in court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense is commenced but appears or is apprehended within twelve months after the failure to appear order was issued by the court, the court may order the owner or possessor of the property, as a part of any sentence imposed for either the failure to appear or the conviction for a covered offense, to pay a storage fee of one hundred dollars per month for each month the property was held following the issuance of the failure to appear order.

Laws 2016, LB1106, § 11;

Laws 2025, LB383, § 15;

Laws 2025, LB559, § 10.

Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention Act, see section 28-1801.

Uniform Controlled Substances Act, see section 28-401.01.